Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-617.13
Delayed birth certificate; department; duties.

The department shall certify on a delayed registration of birth that no other record of the birth is on file with the department.

Laws 1985, LB 42, § 20;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 152;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 427.